Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3870
(UTC 805) Costs of administration.

(UTC 805) In administering a trust, the trustee may incur only costs that are reasonable in relation to the trust property, the purposes of the trust, and the skills of the trustee.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 70.